Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1349
Ethanol facility eligible for tax credits or incentives; employ residents.

Any ethanol facility eligible for tax credits or incentives under the Ethanol Development Act, the Employment and Investment Growth Act, or the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act shall whenever possible employ workers who are residents of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 961, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 3.

Employment and Investment Growth Act, see section 77-4101.

Ethanol Development Act, see section 66-1330.

Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, see section 77-27,187.